Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1256.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART IVLEASES OF REAL PROPERTYSubpartA. Residential Leases SUBPART ARESIDENTIAL LEASESChapter91. Short-Term RentalsCHAPTER 91SHORT-TERM RENTALSSec.123456789101112131415161718 9101. Scope of chapter.9102. Definitions.9103. Rental operator conduct.9104. Limitation on municipal powers.9105. Private cause of action.9106. Fines for failure to register or gain license.9107. Third-party listing platform liability.§ 9101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to short-term rentals of residential property.§ 9102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Property owner." An owner of record of real property offered to a transient as a short-term rental."Rental operator." A property owner, management company or entity that operates a short-term rental."Renter." A transient who pays for the use of a short-term rental."Short-term rental." A residential property or multifamily property offered for rent to a transient for profit for a period less than 30 consecutive days."Third-party listing platform." An electronically accessible technology used as a base for a rental operator to contact a potential renter for the purpose of entering into a contract for a short-term rental."Transient." An individual who fails to establish or maintain a residence at the same premises in this Commonwealth for a period of more than 30 consecutive days.20250HB1256PN1402 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9103. Rental operator conduct.(a) Prohibited conduct.--A rental operator may not:(1) engage in conduct that contravenes a law or regulation, including, but not limited to, criminal law, planning law or regulation of the Federal, State or local government applicable to the operation of the short-term rental property or the short-term rental; or(2) allow a renter to use a short-term rental in a manner that constitutes a public nuisance or violates a law or ordinance regarding public nuisance conduct.(b) Duties.--A rental operator shall:(1) comply with all applicable licensing, registration or permitting requirements of the municipality or community where the rental property is located;(2) comply with all occupancy, health and safety, parking, waste disposal or other ordinances applicable to a short-term rental adopted by the municipality in which the property is located; and(3) be liable to the municipality in which the property is located for action or inaction by a renter that constitutes a violation of a noise, nuisance, parking or waste disposal ordinance, if the rental operator knew or should have known of the action or inaction and failed to take reasonable action to prevent the violation.§ 9104. Limitation on municipal powers.A municipality may not prohibit or unnecessarily delay the approval or registration of a short-term rental that complies with all requirements under this chapter, applicable law, ordinances and zoning requirements.§ 9105. Private cause of action.20250HB1256PN1402 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authorization.--An owner or tenant of real property who is substantially affected by an act of a renter, property owner or rental operator that is a violation of law, regulation or ordinance may bring an action in a court of proper jurisdiction to prevent, restrain, correct or abate the act.(b) Recovery.--A person found liable in a civil action brought under subsection (a) shall pay damages and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the owner or tenant as a result of the action.§ 9106. Fines for failure to register or gain license.(a) Authorization.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a property owner that is subject to a municipal registration or licensing ordinance relating to a short-term rental and fails to comply with the ordinance may be fined by the municipality at a rate not to exceed $500 per day that the property owner fails to comply.(b) Exception.--A property owner whose registration or license to operate has been withdrawn for a violation of a municipal ordinance under subsection (a) and continues to violate the municipal ordinance may be fined by the municipality at a rate not to exceed $1,000 per day that the property owner fails to comply.§ 9107. Third-party listing platform liability.(a) Removal.--If a court finds that a property owner or rental operator has willingly, knowingly or negligently allowed or abetted a repeated violation of law or ordinance applicable to the real property or short-term rental, the court may order that the real property or short-term rental be removed from third-party listing platforms.(b) Cause of action.--If a court order is issued under 20250HB1256PN1402 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a) and the third-party listing platform is found to be in noncompliance, an owner or tenant of real property who is substantially affected by the noncompliance may institute an action in a court of proper jurisdiction to correct or abate the noncompliance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1256PN1402 - 5 - 123456